incubator/apertium-fr-nl/apertium-fr-nl.nl.dix
    <pardef n="verg/eten__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eet</l>
          <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eet</l>
          <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eet</l>
          <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eten</l>
          <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eten</l>
          <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eten</l>
          <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aten</l>
          <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aten</l>
          <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aten</l>
          <r>eten<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="verl/iezen__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>iezen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iest</l>
          <r>iezen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iest</l>
          <r>iezen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iezen</l>
          <r>iezen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iezen</l>
          <r>iezen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iezen</l>
          <r>iezen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oor</l>
          <r>iezen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oor</l>
          <r>iezen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oor</l>
          <r>iezen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oren</l>
          <r>iezen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oren</l>
          <r>iezen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oren</l>
          <r>iezen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="w/ijzen__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijs</l>
          <r>ijzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijst</l>
          <r>ijzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijst</l>
          <r>ijzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijzen</l>
          <r>ijzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijzen</l>
          <r>ijzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijzen</l>
          <r>ijzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ees</l>
          <r>ijzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ees</l>
          <r>ijzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ees</l>
          <r>ijzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ezen</l>
          <r>ijzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ezen</l>
          <r>ijzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ezen</l>
          <r>ijzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="z/ingen__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ingt</l>
          <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ingt</l>
          <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ingen</l>
          <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ingen</l>
          <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ingen</l>
          <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ong</l>
          <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ong</l>
          <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ong</l>
          <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ongen</l>
          <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ongen</l>
          <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ongen</l>
          <r>ingen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="vergeten"><i>verg</i><par n="verg/eten__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verliezen"><i>verl</i><par n="verl/iezen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wijzen"><i>w</i><par n="w/ijzen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zingen"><i>z</i><par n="z/ingen__vblex"/></e>
